Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.155

Child sexual abuse and sex trafficking prevention and identification public-private partnership account.

The child sexual abuse and sex trafficking prevention and identification public-private partnership account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources, federal funds, and any appropriations made by the legislature or other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for curriculum and professional development to support instruction on child sexual abuse and sex trafficking prevention and identification. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2023 c 328 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 328: See note following RCW 28A.320.168.